Washington statutes.
RCW 7.05.100

Arbitration agreement—Interim measures by court.

It is not incompatible with an arbitration agreement for a party to request, before or during arbitral proceedings, from a court an interim measure of protection and for a court to grant such measure.

[ 2015 c 276 s 10.]